Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3314.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin LAKE SUPERIOR COLLEGE; PFAS ABATEMENT, REMEDIATION, MITIGATION, AND TREATMENT.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $2,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Pollution Control Agency for a grant to Lake Superior College to design, engineer, and construct improvements for the abatement, remediation, mitigation, and treatment of perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) contamination at the Lake Superior College Emergency Response Training Center. This appropriation includes money for the construction of wells, equipment, and facilities and improvements to the existing equipment and facilities for site remediation and water treatment infrastructure. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $2,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end